Washington statutes.
RCW 26.18.240

Extension of rights and responsibilities—Domestic partnerships.

(1) For the purposes of chapter 26.21A RCW, any privilege, immunity, right, benefit, or responsibility granted or imposed by chapter 26.21A RCW, the uniform interstate family support act, to or on an individual because the individual is or was married is granted or imposed on equivalent terms, substantive and procedural, to or on an individual who is or was in a domestic partnership.

(2) For the purposes of chapter 26.21A RCW, any privilege, immunity, right, benefit, or responsibility granted or imposed by chapter 26.21A RCW, the uniform interstate family support act, to or on a spouse with respect to a child is granted or imposed on equivalent terms, substantive and procedural, to or on a domestic partner with respect to a child.

[ 2008 c 6 s 1048.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—Severability—2008 c 6: See RCW 26.60.900 and 26.60.901.